Utah statutes.
58-80a-201.   Certified Medical Language Interpreter Advisory Board.

The division shall notify the Health and Human Services Interim Committee if it determines that there is a need to create, by statute, a Certified Medical Language Interpreter Advisory Board.



Enacted by Chapter 127, 2010 General Session

